Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.057

Benefit calculation—Limitation.

(1) The annual compensation taken into account in calculating retiree benefits under this system shall not exceed the limits imposed by section 401(a)(17) of the federal internal revenue code for qualified trusts.

(2) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

[ 1995 c 145 s 1.]